North Carolina, session 2025, HB1180.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 62-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 62-3. Definitions.
As used in this Chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the term:
…
(16a) "Large-load data center" means a facility (i) whose primary services are the
storage, management, and processing of digital data, (ii) that is used to house
computer and network systems, including associated components such as
servers and other telecommunications equipment and appliances, and (iii) that
has or is projected to have an aggregate demand of more than 20 megawatts.
Facilities located on contiguous or adjacent sites shall be considered a single
facility for purposes of calculating aggregate demand if under common
ownership or effective control.
(16a)(16b) "Local exchange company" means a person holding, on January 1, 1995,
a certificate to provide local exchange services or exchange access services.
…
(28a) "Tariff" means any compensation, charge, fare, rate, schedule, toll, or
classification demanded, observed, charged, or collected by any public utility,
for any service product or commodity offered by it to the public, and any rules,
regulations, practices, or contracts affecting such compensation, charge, fare,
rate, schedule, toll, or classification.
…."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 62-133.5(h)(1)a. reads as rewritten:
"a. Local exchange company. – The same meaning as provided in
G.S. 62-3(16a).G.S. 62-3(16b)."
SECTION 1.(c) Article 7 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-133.25. Electric service tariffs for large-load data centers.
(a) Each electric public utility shall file for Commission approval a tariff for the provision
of electric service to large-load data centers, as defined in G.S. 62-3. This tariff shall be
applicable only for customers that are large-load data centers. However, the Commission may
approve a tiered tariff schedule that includes different rates, terms, or conditions for different
*H1180-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
classes of large-load data centers based on load requirements or other factors related to the cost
of service.
(b) Each tariff application filed with the Commission under this section shall be designed
to ensure that large-load data center customers are responsible for the entire cost of any capital
investments or incremental operational expenses necessary for the utility to provide electric
service to large-load data centers and to protect other electric customers from incurring any rate
increases caused by serving large-load data center customers. Furthermore, tariff applications
shall include provisions necessary to ensure that other electric customers are not placed at higher
risk of shouldering any stranded costs as a result of large-load data center customers ceasing
operations or else consuming less electricity than initially requested.
(c) The Commission shall require that each tariff filed by an electric public utility to serve
large-load data centers incorporate the following terms and conditions for the protection of other
customers:
(1) A minimum contract term that obligates a large-load data center customer to
take electric service for a term of no less than 10 years.
(2) A minimum billing demand requirement that obligates a large-load data center
customer to take or pay, for a period of no less than 10 years following
commencement of service, at least eighty-five percent (85%) of the maximum
electric service requested by the customer.
(3) A financial assurance or surety requirement that is sufficient to protect other
ratepayers against any material increase in rates occurring as a result of a
large-load data center customer ceasing operations or taking less service than
initially requested.
(4) A requirement that a large-load data center customer give the electric public
utility advanced notice prior to any anticipated reduction in its demand for
electricity.
(5) Any other provisions that the Commission determines to be reasonable and in
the public interest.
(d) The Commission may only approve a tariff application for providing electric service
to large-load data centers upon finding that the tariff, in addition to being just and reasonable and
in compliance with the requirements of this section, includes rates, terms, and other conditions
necessary to protect and hold harmless other electric customers from having to bear any increased
costs attributable to serving large-load data centers."
SECTION 1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law. The tariff application
required to be filed with the Utilities Commission pursuant to G.S. 62-133.25, as enacted by
subsection (c) of this section, shall be filed by the electric public utility no later than 180 days
after the effective date of this section. Effective January 1, 2028, an electric public utility shall
not provide electric service to a large-load data center except under the terms of a tariff approved
by the Utilities Commission in accordance with G.S. 62-133.25.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 105-164.3(47), 105-164.3(79), 105-164.3(201),
105-164.13(43a)b., 105-164.13(55), and 105-164.13(55a) are repealed.
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective January 1, 2027, and applies to sales
made on or after that date.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1180-First Edition